src/fst/morphology/phonology.xfscript
!! !!!Cornish morph-phon grammar file


!! # Cornish morphphonology

!! This is the file for the morphophonological rules.

!! We keep a verbose style, at each point we tell what we will do.
!! That is the echo commands.

!! ## Definitions

echo << We define our definitions >>

!! Here, we have left some documentation for curious readers:

!! * ^S = 2 = soft mutation						     \\
!! * ^A = 3 = breathed mutation					     \\
!! * ^P = 4 = hard mutation						     \\
!! * ^M = 5 = mixed mutation						     \\
!! * ^V = vowel affection							     \\
!! * ^E = triggers o to e in agent suffix			     \\
!! * ^D = no mutation dummy for immutable words	     \\
!! * ^CD = triggers consonant doubling in subjunctive  \\
!! * ^TRUNC = 									     \\

!! These triggers are given a name, so that we can delete them when
!! they have done their job.

!! * DummySymbols
define DummySymbols [ %^S | %^A | %^P | %^M | %^V | %^E | %^D | 
               %^TRUNC | %^CD | %^UML | %^STDEL ] ;

!! * Boundary
define Boundary  %> ;

!! * Dummy
define Dummy [ DummySymbols | Boundary ] ;

!! * Vow 
define Vow   [ a | e | i | o | u | e3 | a4 | o4 | 
               A | E | I | O | U  ] ;
!! * Cns 
define Cns   [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | 
               B | C | D | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | P | Q | R | S | 
               t | v | w | x | z |
               T | V | W | X | Z ] ;

!! * Yy 
define Yy [ y | Y ] ;               

! Werden wir <y> nicht auch in der Liste der Vokale brauchen?
! hmm, ich sehe dein punkt.
! z.B. in der gh > h-Regel: byghan > byhan. Müssen wir y1 vs. y2 machen?
! vielleicht 3 gruppen
! Vow Cns y


!! * Symbols 
define Symbols [ %- ] ;
               
!! * Sgm 
define Sgm   [ Vow | Cns | Yy | Dummy | Symbols | Archi ] ;

!! ## Rules

!! Here the action begins.

echo << We define our rules >>

!! ### Mutations
echo << ... first the mutations >>

!! !identity
define identity [ g -> g , G -> G || .#. _ ] ;

!! gsoft: 
!! If we encounter a final %^S symbol, we delete an initial g
define gsoft [ g -> 0 , G -> 0 || .#. _ [a|e|i|l|r|w|y] [ Sgm ]* %^S ] ;

!! Etc for changing g to h in front of %^M, etc.
define gmixed [ g -> h , G -> H || .#. _ [a|e|i|w|y] [Sgm]* %^M ] ;

!! Then we generalise:
!! softmut p -> b etc. in front of %^S
define softmut [ p -> b , t -> d , k -> g , 
                 P -> B , T -> D , K -> G ,
                 b -> v , d -> d h , 
                 B -> V , D -> D h ,
                 m -> v , c h -> j ,
                 M -> V , C h -> J || .#. _ [Sgm]* %^S ] ;

!! Change gw to g with gwsimplification
define gwsimplification [ w -> 0 || .#. [g|G] _ (r) [o|u] [Sgm]* (Dummy - %^S) ] ;

!! Aspirant mutation p > f etc. in front of %^A
define aspmut [ p -> f, P -> F , t -> t h , T -> T h || .#. _ [Sgm]* %^A ] ;

!! k to h in front of %^A with kaspmut
define kaspmut [ k -> h , K -> H || .#. _ ~[l|r] [Sgm]* %^A ] ;

!! !The other consonant rules
echo << then other consonant rules >>
 
!! Devoicing b -> p etc. in front of %^P
define prov [ b -> p , d -> t , g -> k ,
              B -> P , D -> T , G -> K || .#. _ [Sgm ]* %^P ] ;

!! Voiced plosive to fric with mixed in front of %^M
define mixed [ b -> f , d -> t , m -> f ,
               B -> F , D -> T , M -> F || .#. _ [Sgm ]* %^M ] ;

!define cluster [ w -> 0 || g _ r [Sgm]* [%^D|%^P]];

!! Nonmutation as identity when we do not have triggers.
!! Hmm, why is this needed?
define Nonmutation [ a -> a, e -> e, o -> o, y -> y, u -> u, i -> i, f -> f,
                     h -> h, j -> j, l -> l, n -> n, r -> r, s -> s, 
                     v -> v, w -> w || .#. _ [Sgm]* [ ~[%^A|%^S|%^M|%^P] ] ] ;

!! ConsonantDoublingI bdg in front of %^CD
define ConsonantDoublingI  b -> p p , g -> k k , d -> t t || _ ([l|r]) %^CD ;

!! ConsonantDoublingII t in front of %^CD
define ConsonantDoublingII t -> t t || Vow _ h (Vow) %^CD ;
! this probably holds for more than t. Check also left context in next rule.

!! ConsonantDoublingIII  various cns in front of %^CD
define ConsonantDoublingIII d h -> t h , h -> g h ,
                           f   -> f f , k -> k k , l -> l l , m -> m m , n -> n n ,
                           p   -> p p , r -> r r , s -> s s , t -> t t , v -> f f ,
                           h e -> h a h a , j -> c h || Vow _ (Vow) %^CD ;
! note! added left context Vow!!! check this. TT.

!! Devoicing b -> p
define Devoicing b -> p || Vow _ %> s ;
! enebi > enepsi

!! Deleting light stem vowel with LightStemVow
define LightStemVow  Vow -> 0 || _ (Dummy) [ %^TRUNC %> Vow ] ;
!define LightStemVow  Vow -> 0 || _ (Dummy)  %^TRUNC ;
 ! a r h a %^V %^TRUNC .#. ->  a r h %^V %^TRUNC .#.


define NoFinalH   h -> g h || Cns Vow (l|r) _ Dummy* .#. ,,
 				  g h -> h || Cns Vow (l|r) _ %> [Vow|l|r] ;
 ! a r h  %^V %^TRUNC .#. -> a r g h %^V %^TRUNC .#.

define STDEL t -> 0 || _ %> %^STDEL ;

echo << ... then the rest >>

define VowelAffection [ a -> e, e -> y, o -> e || _ Sgm* %^V ] ;

define OtoE           [ o -> e || _ [ r %^E ] ] ;
  
  
define LightSuffixEK e3 -> o || _ Cns %> o w ;

!! AuslautHerdung
!define AuslautHerdung f -> v , t -> d , p -> b , k -> g || _ (Dummy) %> Vow ;

!! Umlaut of e3, a4, ... in %^UML contexts
define Umlaut a4 -> e , o4 -> e || _ Sgm* [ %> y o n | %^UML ] ; 
!! Always Uml if affix. Then Uml if no affix, but when %^UML mark

!! The triggers have done their work
!! The order of rules here is not crucial, crucial is the order below:
!! But it is a good idea to have the same rule here as well.
!! Dummydeletion comes last:

echo << We tidy up our dummys >>

!! ArchiPhonemes should not be on the surface
define ArchiPhonemes         e3 -> e , a4 -> a , o4 -> o ;

define DummyDeletion [ DummySymbols -> 0 ] ;  ! For use for speller generation
define DummyDeletion [ Dummy -> 0 ] ;         ! For normal use

!! ## Compilation

!! Then we compile, one rule after another.

echo << We compile it all >>

read regex [ Nonmutation !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. identity			 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. gsoft				 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. gmixed				 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. softmut 			 !!≈ * @CODE@
!.o. gwsimplification	 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. aspmut 				 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. kaspmut 			 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. prov				 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. mixed				 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. Nonmutation			 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. ConsonantDoublingI	 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. ConsonantDoublingII	 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. ConsonantDoublingIII !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. Devoicing			 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. LightStemVow		 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. NoFinalH			 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. STDEL				 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. VowelAffection		 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. OtoE				 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. LightSuffixEK		 !!≈ * @CODE@
!.o. AuslautHerdung		 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. Umlaut				 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. ArchiPhonemes		 !!≈ * @CODE@
.o. DummyDeletion 		 !!≈ * @CODE@
] ;						 !!≈ * @CODE@
